Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4845.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11c. (1) All Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all construction projects of the department concerning highways, streets, roads, and bridges, whose cost exceeds $100,000.00 for construction or preservation as that term is defined in section 10c, shall must be performed by contract awarded by competitive bidding unless the department affirmatively finds that under the circumstances relating to those projects, some other method is in the public interest. The director of the department shall report his or her the director's findings to the state transportation commission 90 days before work is commenced and promptly in writing to the appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives. However, in a case in which if the department determines emergency action is required, the reports need not be filed before a contract is awarded but shall must be promptly filed. The installation or upgrading of advanced traffic operation centers and traffic signal systems is exempt from this subsection. (2) All Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and subsection (3), all construction projects of a local road agency whose costs exceed $100,000.00 for construction or preservation, excluding maintenance, shall that meet the criteria described in subsection (3) must be performed by contract awarded by competitive bidding unless the local road agency affirmatively finds that under the circumstances relating to those projects, some other method is in the public interest. Installation or upgrading of advanced traffic management operation centers and signals is traffic signal systems and the resurfacing of local roads are exempt from this subsection. A county road commission shall report its findings before work is commenced in writing to the county board of commissioners of that county. A city or village shall report its findings before work is commenced in writing to the governing elected body of that city or village. As used in this subsection, "local road agency" means that term as defined in section 9a. (3) Subsection (2) applies to the construction projects of a local road agency as follows: (a) Subject to subdivision (c), to any construction project if the individual project and contiguous project costs exceed $350,000.00 for construction or preservation, excluding routine maintenance. (b) Subject to subdivision (c), and except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, to each construction project of a local road agency in a fiscal year after the local road agency exceeds $1,350,000.00 in total costs for construction or preservation, excluding routine maintenance, in that fiscal year. This subdivision does not apply to a city or village with a population of more than 500,000. (c) After the first full fiscal year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subdivision, the department shall do both of the following: (i) Adjust the dollar amounts described in subdivisions (a) and (b) for inflation for each subsequent fiscal year using the most comprehensive Consumer Price Index available for this state from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (ii) Post the adjusted dollar amounts described in subparagraph (i) on the department's website.